Maine, session 132, LD1219.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §10901, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Peer institution. "Peer institution" means a postsecondary education institution
that is used for comparative analysis and benchmarking of institutional qualities as
determined by the trustees for each campus of the university.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §10912 is enacted to read:
§10912. Campus funding levels; hourly employee minimum wage
1. Fiscal year 2026-27 funding level. Beginning July 1, 2026, for the 2026-27 fiscal
year, each campus of the university must be funded at no less than 95% of the funding that
the campus's peer institution receives from the peer institution's state on a per student basis.
The university, in calculating the peer institution's funding, shall use the most recent data
available.
2. Fiscal year 2027-28 funding level. Beginning July 1, 2027, for the 2027-28 fiscal
year, each campus of the university must be funded at no less than 100% of the funding
that the campus's peer institution receives from the peer institution's state on a per student
basis. The university, in calculating the peer institution's funding, shall use the most recent
data available.
3. Minimum wage to hourly employees. Beginning July 1, 2025, the minimum hourly
wage at the university is equal to 125% of the minimum hourly wage established in Title
26, section 664, subsection 1.
Sec. 3. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
UNIVERSITY OF MAINE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE
Educational and General Activities - UMS 0031
Initiative: Provides ongoing funds to support a 6% increase in funding for fiscal year
2025-26 and an additional 4% increase in funding for fiscal year 2026-27 to support the
continuation of current University of Maine System operations.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $14,371,274 $24,526,974
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $14,371,274 $24,526,974
Page 1 - 132LR1731(01)

Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.